Illinois, session 104th, HB1379.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-1-1 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/1-1-1)  (from Ch. 24, par. 1-1-1)7    Sec. 1-1-1. This Code shall be known and and may be cited 8as the Illinois Municipal Code.9(Source: Laws 1961, p. 576.)